Tennessee, session 114, HB0910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-21-203(c)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-6-109(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
To identify any Tennessee laws, rules, programs, services, and budgetary
priorities that conflict with the components, guidelines, and objectives of the
comprehensive state policy, as defined and established by the human rights commission
under § 4-21-203(c)(2), to ensure and to promote present and future compliance with
Title VI requirements;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0910
003147
- 1 -